District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.61

Cap on sentenced persons housed at District of Columbia Jail.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the number of sentenced persons housed at the District of Columbia Jail (Central Detention Facility) by the Department of Corrections shall not exceed 2,050 at any time.

(b)

If the Department of Corrections requires an exemption to the cap on the number of sentenced persons established by subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor shall transmit a resolution requesting an exemption to the Council for a 30-day period of review. The transmitted resolution requesting an exemption shall include the reasons for the exemption, the consequences if the exemption is not approved, and the time the exemption shall be in force. If the Council has not approved or disapproved the resolution requesting an exemption within the 30-day review period, the resolution requesting an exemption shall be deemed disapproved.

History

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 3102, 49 DCR 6968